Utah statutes.
77-24a-2.   Disposition by police agency.

All unclaimed property coming into the possession of a peace officer or law enforcement agency shall be turned over to, held, and disposed of only by the local law enforcement agency whose authority extends to the area where the item was found.



Enacted by Chapter 131, 1986 General Session

